utilities/dictionaries/ga_GA-Irish.aff
# hunspell affix file for Irish by Kevin Scannell
# I created this file by converting my ispell affix file on 5 August 2002
# Exactly the same set of affixes, except one can avoid the acrobatics
# for the verb "buígh" because hunspell is a bit smarter about
# combining affixes
#
#               ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
#               ****** ******     ***
#
# Copyright 2002-2007 Kevin P. Scannell
#
#    This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
#    (at your option) any later version.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#    You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
#    along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
#    Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA
#    02110-1301, USA.
#
#
# Consult the web page
#
#   https://cadhan.com/gaelspell/
#
# for detailed information about these packages and installation information.

SET UTF-8

# TRY aihnrsetcdoglumbíéáfóúpvjzxywqk    (Aug. 2002, 8MB corpus)
# TRY aihnrestcoldgumíábéfúóCpATBSIDNMGRFLEOPHÉUÁÓÍyÚJvkqKWVwzxjYQZX    (Sept. 2003, 75MB corpus)
# Latest: July 2006, 128MB corpus
# TRY aihnretsocldgmuíábéfúóACpTSINBDEMRGL-FOP'HUyÉwvÁÓkÍJÚWKxVYqzjXZQ
# May 2008, full aimsigh.com corpus
TRY aihnertsolcdgmuáíbéfúóCApTSBGFILDMRNP-E'OÉÓUÁÚvÍVHZjzQJxqXwyYKkW
#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#
#                Start hunspell affix file extensions                       #
#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#
WORDCHARS -'

# see gramadoir morph-ga; not bothering with any replacements
# from that file that are anchored at ^ or $, nor with any that
# simply add a fada (hopefully handled by MAP rules below),
# nor with derivational morphology, since these are undesirable for
# spelling replacement
REP 64
REP a á
REP e é
REP i í
REP o ó
REP u ú
REP uigh aigh
REP uith aith
REP idhth ith
REP ighth ith
REP sg sc
REP sb sp
REP sd st
REP dn nn
REP eu éa
REP tch t
REP idhea ío
REP ighea ío
REP idhe í
REP ighe í
REP uím aím
REP uít aít
REP uío aío
REP aghadh ú
REP adha ú
REP ádh á
REP mhth f
REP bhth f
REP thmh f
REP thbh f
REP thch ch
REP tht t
REP ghaí aí
REP llr lr
REP lls ls
REP llt lt
REP nnc nc
REP nnd nd
REP nnl nl
REP nnr nr
REP nns ns
REP nnt nt
REP aingc aing
REP éagc éag
REP éigc éig
REP iargc iarg
REP éadt éad
REP éidt éid
REP domb dom
REP díomb díom
REP dhomb dhom
REP dhíomb dhíom
REP anbhf anbh
REP ainbhf ainbh
REP ighim ím
REP ighidh í
REP ighinn ínn
REP éá éa
REP áí ái
REP éí éi
REP óí ói
REP úí úi
REP íó ío
REP íá iá
REP íú iú

MAP 5
MAP aáAÁ
MAP eéEÉ
MAP iíIÍ
MAP oóOÓ
MAP uúUÚ

#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#
#     End hunspell extensions; remainder are PFX and SFX specifications     #
#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#-#

PFX S Y 18
PFX S   b     bh          b
PFX S   B     Bh          B
PFX S   c     ch          c
PFX S   C     Ch          C
PFX S   d     dh          d
PFX S   D     Dh          D
PFX S   f     fh          f
PFX S   F     Fh          F
PFX S   g     gh          g
PFX S   G     Gh          G
PFX S   m     mh          m
PFX S   M     Mh          M
PFX S   p     ph          p
PFX S   P     Ph          P
PFX S   s     sh          s[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX S   S     Sh          S[aeiouáéíóúlnr]
PFX S   t     th          t
PFX S   T     Th          T

PFX U Y 16
PFX U   0     m           b[^h]
PFX U   bh    mb          bh
PFX U   0     g           c[^h]
PFX U   ch    gc          ch
PFX U   0     n           d[^h\']
PFX U   dh    nd          dh
PFX U   0     bh          f[^h]
PFX U   fh    bhf         fh
PFX U   0     n           g[^h]
PFX U   gh    ng          gh
PFX U   0     b           p[^h]
PFX U   ph    bp          ph
PFX U   0     d           t[^h]
PFX U   th    dt          th
PFX U   d'  n-        d'[aeiouáéíóú]
PFX U   0     n-        [aeiouáéíóú]

PFX B N 2
PFX B   0     b'          [aeiouáéíóú]
PFX B   f     b'fh        f

PFX H N 1
PFX H   0     h           [aeiouáéíóú]

PFX M N 2
PFX M   0     m'          [aeiouáéíóú]
PFX M   f     m'fh        f

PFX D N 2
PFX D   0     d'          [aeiouáéíóú]
PFX D   f     d'fh        f

PFX T N 2
PFX T   0     t-        [aeiouáéíóú]
PFX T   0     t           s
