utilities/dictionaries/ga_GA-Irish.dic
achasánach/HB
achomharc/HMDBUT
achta/HMDU
achtainíd/HMDBU
adhaltraigh/HMDBU
adhlacóir/HMDBUT
adhmholadh/HMDBUT
adhraitheoirí/HMDBU
aduantais/HMDU
aeriompróir/HMDBUT
aerpháirce/HMDU
aerspásanna/HMDBU
aerstráice/HMDBUT
aerthormán/HMDBUT
agallóir/HMDBUT
aguisíní/HMDBU
aibhseoir/HMDBUT
aibhsitheoirí/HMDBU
aicmitheora/HMDU
aidhnín/HMDBUT
aiféalaí/B
aigní/HMDBU
ailbíneachais/HMDU
ailpíneach/HMDBUT
aimbiaiche/B
aimirne/HMDBU
aimniceintéis/HMDBU
aimplitheoir/HMDBUT
aincheas/HMDBUT
ainchreidmhí/B
aindiagacht/HMDBU
ainhidríd/HMDBU
ainmluach/HMDBUT
ainmneora/HMDU
ainmnitheach/HMDBUT
ainteastach/HMDBUT
ainíse/HMDU
airceach/HB
aircitíopa/HMDBUT
airneog/HMDBU
airt/HMDBU
aisbhuille/HMDBUT
aischlónna/HMDBU
aischuirtear/HU
aisghairigí/HU
aistrithe/HBMDU
aistritheoir/HMDBUT
aiséirithe/HBMDU
aiséitigh/HMDBU
albastar/HMDBUT
alcól/HMDBUT
alfa-shiollabra/HMDBUT
algach/HB
alsáisigh/HMDBU
alúmanaim/HMDU
am-íditheacha/B
amadána/HMDBU
amchomhartha/HMDBUT
amhailteacha/HMDBU
amháin/HB
amlóir/HMDBUT
amúchadh/HMDBUT
an-chasta/HB
an-chúnaimh/HMDU
an-dlúithe/B
an-fhaitíos/HMDBUT
an-ghean/HMDBUT
an-leabhar/HMDBUT
an-léargais/HMDU
an-sciliúil/HB
an-tuirse/HMDBU
anachain/HMDBU
anailíse/HMDU
anatamaíocht/HMDBU
anbhás/HMDBUT
anchumhachtaí/HMDBU
andóchasaí/B
angstram/HMDBUT
annamhacht/HMDBU
antallasach/HMDBUT
análaígí/HU
anás/HMDBUT
aoi-léachtóir/HMDBUT
aolchoinneal/HMDBU
aon/HBMDUT
aonphléacsanna/HMDBU
aontachtaithe/HMDBU
aontú/HMDBUT
aosú/HMDBUT
araí/HMDBU
araíocht/HMDBU
arc/HMDBUT
ard-dlús/HMDBUT
ardfheidhmíocht/HMDBU
ardfheidhmíochta/HMDU
ardfheis/HMDBU
ardléann/HMDBUT
ardréim/HMDBU
ardrúnaí/HMDBUT
ardtaitneamh/HMDBUT
armas/HMDBUT
armóiní/HMDBU
arán/HMDBUT
asamtóiteach/HB
asbheir/HU
ascain/HU
astarraingtí/HMDBU
asáitígí/HU
atarraingt/HMDBU
athbhaisteadh/HUBMDT
athbharra/HMDBU
athbhreithnithe/HBMDU
athcheanglaígí/HU
athchoireanna/HMDBU
athchomhaireamh/HMDBUT
athchuimhnídís/HU
athchóipeála/HUMD
athdheilbhiú/HUBMDT
athdhírithe/HMDU
athfhócasú/HMDBUT
athghiniúna/HMDU
athghlactha/HBMDU
athlonnaíodh/HU
athluadh/HU
athmheasúnú/HMDBUT
athobair/HMDBU
athordaithe/HBMDU
athscinn/HU
athsmaoinimh/HMDU
athspreagadh/HMDBUT
athéiríche/B
atochras/HMDBUT
atoghaim/UA
aturnae/HMDBUT
balsamaigh/SU
bambairní/SU
barréadrom/S
beagnithe/US
beirtreacha/US
bhroidearnaínn/FU
blaisféimeadh/US
bliteoirí/US
bogshneachta/US
bonnáin/US
bragaire/US
brionglóideach/SU
brionnú/US
bréiche/US
brúchtadh/US
buirge/US
bundualgas/US
bursa/US
béasacha/SU
bíogacha/S
cailimhineoige/US
caimileoin/US
callaistéineacha/S
canóntachta/US
caolchúiseach/S
castóirí/US
casurlaí/US
ceansaitheoir/US
cearr/SU
ceolchluichí/US
chlipe/U
cháithe/U
ciontacha/S
cithréim/US
cleachtaidh/US
clochaim/USA
cláideacha/US
cniogaim/USA
cnáibeach/S
coimriú/US
coindriseacha/US
comaitéirí/US
comhbhailitheoir/US
comhdhuillí/US
comhphá/US
comhshaoránach/US
consalaí/S
copóg/US
coscracha/S
craobhlíne/US
creathánach/S
crotharnach/US
croíphrionsabail/US
cróineolaíoch/S
crústála/US
cuirí/US
curcaí/SU
cáití/SU
cócaireachta/US
cóimhéid/US
cúlcheadú/US
cúlghearrthóirí/US
d'athchumainn/EU
d'ionsáigh/U
damáistím/USC
daonphoblachta/US
deacraí/S
dearthóireachta/US
deircí/S
dhonaínn/FU
dibhéirsiú/US
dinglise/US
dochloiste/S
doineann/US
doscúiche/S
droch-choinníollacha/US
drochdhathaí/S
dréimríocht/US
dríodáil/US
débheathach/SU
dí-thagartha/SU
dífhoraoisithe/US
díreog/US
díse/US
dúrúin/US
eachtardhíol/HMDBUT
eachtrannach/HBMDUT
eacstais/HMDBU
eadarbhuasaígí/HU
ealtú/HUBMDT
eangú/HUBMDT
eapainmneacha/B
earc/HMDBUT
easbhrúnna/HMDBU
easonórach/HB
easpagóideacht/HMDBU
eastósc/HU
eipiciúracha/B
eipidéimeolaí/HMDBUT
eipidéimeolaíochta/HMDU
eipsealón/HMDBUT
eire/HMDBUT
eisimirceach/HBMDUT
eisnádúrtha/HB
eisíocaíochtaí/HMDBU
eitleáin/HMDBU
eochaircheist/HMDBU
eotanáise/HMDU
fadchaintí/BS
fadóige/MDUS
faicsimile/MDBUS
faicín/MDBUS
faisnéise/MDUS
faladhúdaí/MDBUS
falairí/MDBUS
faoisceáin/MDBUS
faonlaga/BS
feall/MDBUS
fealsúnachtaí/MDBUS
feascair/MDBUS
feiceanna/MDBUS
feidhliú/USBMD
feidhmchláirín/MDBUS
feithimh/MDBUS
feo-úinéireacht/MDBUS
fhorscríobha/U
fiaghabhair/MDBUS
fiaileach/BS
ficsin/MDUS
fillidh/MDUS
filltíneach/BS
fiordanna/MDBUS
fiosaithe/SBUMD
fiosaíochta/MDUS
fliúiteadóra/US
fo-chraicneacha/BS
fo-mhírcheann/MDBUS
foclach/BS
fodar/MDBUS
foilseáin/MDBUS
foirfiú/MDBUS
foirmleoir/MDBUS
foltliath/BS
fondúireacht/MDBUS
forbarthacha/BS
forchéime/MDUS
foriomlána/BS
forleithne/BSMDU
formholadh/USBMD
formhínithe/MDUSB
forscríobh/MDBUS
forúsáideoir/MDBUS
foshraitheanna/MDBUS
fothuithe/MDBUS
frithbheartaíochta/US
frásleabhar/US
fuarlaigh/MDBUS
fuascailte/BSMDU
fuipeála/MDUS
fuirseoirí/MDBUS
fáireacha/MDBUS
fámaireacht/MDBUS
féadachtála/MDUS
féinmhuiníne/MDUS
féintruailliú/MDBUS
féirseog/MDBUS
fíním/USC
fíonchaora/MDBUS
fíoriarrachtaí/MDBUS
fíorúlaithe/MDUS
fóirnéal/MDBUS
fóntaíocha/BS
gailseacha/US
gairbhe/SU
gasailí/US
gearrbhodaigh/US
geoiste/US
giolca/US
gleadharfar/US
gliúdóg/US
gnéasachta/US
goineadóirí/US
grúntáilte/S
guiséid/US
iaimh/HMDU
iallach/HMDBUT
iar-bhunoideachas/HMDBUT
iarcheannaire/HMDBUT
iarfhostóra/HMDU
iariománaí/HMDBUT
iarmhairí/B
iarmharaigh/HMDBU
iarsmalanna/HMDBU
iarthrámach/HB
idirbhriseadh/HMDBUT
idirbhriste/HBMDU
idirchéime/HMDU
idirchúigeacha/B
idirlínte/HMDBU
idirmhalartaítear/HU
il-cheardscoileanna/HMDBU
ilbhliantóga/HMDBU
ildathaí/B
ildeontas/HMDBUT
iltéarmaigh/HMDBU
imcháineadh/HMDBUT
imeaglaítear/HU
imoibriúchán/HMDBUT
imoibríocht/HMDBU
impiriúil/HB
impíocha/HBMDU
imthaca/HMDBUT
inchurtha/HB
ineirgiú/HUBMDT
infeirithe/HBMDU
infhála/HB
iniúchadh/HMDBUT
inneonacha/HMDBU
insamhalta/HMDU
inscríbhinn/HMDBU
insintí/HMDBU
intinn/HMDBU
iolaigh/HMDBU
iomadú/HMDBUT
iomaíche/B
iombhagairtí/HMDBU
ionad/HMDBUT
ionchorprú/HMDBUT
ionraí/HBMDU
ionróir/HMDBUT
ionsaitheoirí/HMDBU
irisleabhar/HMDBUT
mailíseacha/S
meabhraíochta/S
mionaeráid/S
muileann/S
mífhearúil/S
mórshrónaí/S
ochslaíoch/HBMDUT
ocsamórón/HMDBUT
oftailmeolaíochta/HMDU
oibile/HMDU
oideam/HMDBUT
oileánachais/HMDU
oiriúnacha/B
oisín/HMDBUT
oladhatha/HMDU
ollchomhlachtaí/HMDBU
optamú/HMDBUT
oratóir/HMDBUT
ornáideachais/HMDU
ornáideachas/HMDBUT
paraicéiteamól/US
piardóige/US
plécháipéis/US
pontaifeachta/US
príomheagraíocht/US
príomhphíobáin/US
sabhsa/ST
sacraimintí/S
sailpítir/ST
sainoidhrithe/ST
samhlaithe/ST
saor-reic/ST
saotharlann/ST
satlaím/SC
seachvótáil/ST
sean-aintín/ST
seancheoil/ST
seanfhóid/ST
seanphéire/ST
searantamaim/ST
searrachúil/S
seilbh/ST
seismeolaíocht/ST
siansa/ST
sineach/ST
siortaitheora/ST
siostail/ST
slaba/ST
sleamhaine/ST
sloda/ST
slánlann/ST
sneaic/ST
snámh/S
socadáin/ST
soiléirse/ST
sonuachair/ST
sraonta/ST
sráidí/ST
sráin/ST
suibiachtúlacht/ST
sábhchuil/ST
sárchéim/ST
séidfíl/ST
síleála/S
síobaire/ST
síorchasta/ST
sóisialaithe/ST
súsa/ST
tadaithe/US
taiscthe/SU
Teileagúise/S
teirminéal/US
tocsaineolaíochta/US
toirbheartacha/S
triogóine/US
trost/US
tuillimh/US
téacsphróiseáil/US
túraí/S
uainíní/HMDBU
uaislithe/HBMDU
uasalathar/HMDU
uastiarpa/HMDBUT
ubhchruthaígí/HU
uilebhith/HMDBUT
uinnimintí/HMDBU
uiscedhath/HMDBUT
ullmhaitheoirí/HMDBU
ungthachta/HMDU
urdhúnta/HMDBU
urrúntacht/HMDBU
urscartadh/HUBMDT
ursóige/HMDU
áisionaid/HMDBU
áitiú/HMDBUT
áraisín/HMDBUT
áth/HMDBUT
éaglainne/HMDU
éagmaisí/B
éanach/HMDBUT
éifeachtacht/HMDBU
éiginnte/HB
éilitheach/HB
éinstéiniam/HMDBUT
íobartach/HBMDUT
íocleasaídís/HU
íoschaighdeán/HMDBUT
íosphointe/HMDBUT
ócáidí/HBMDU
ógchiontóir/HMDBUT
óstóra/HMDU
úireolaithe/HMDBU
úitsigh/HMDBU
úllord/HMDBUT
